Wisconsin, session 2025, SB98.
do enact as follows:SB98,11Section 1. 613.76 of the statutes is created to read:SB98,2,52613.76 Conversion of a cooperative association into a service 3insurance corporation. (1) Authorization. A cooperative association 4organized under s. 185.981 may be converted into a service insurance corporation 5under this chapter as provided in this section.SB98,2,76(2) Action by board. A cooperative association seeking conversion under this 7section shall adopt a plan of conversion stating all of the following:SB98,2,88(a) The reasons for and purposes of the proposed action.SB98,2,109(b) The proposed terms, conditions, and procedures for implementing the 10conversion.SB98,2,1111(c) The proposed name of the service insurance corporation.SB98,2,1212(d) The proposed articles and bylaws of the service insurance corporation.SB98,3,513(3) Commissioner’s approval required. (a) No proposed plan of conversion 1under this section may be submitted to the members of the cooperative association 2under sub. (4) until the cooperative association submits the plan adopted under sub. 3(2) to the commissioner, together with as much of the information under s. 611.13 4(2) as the commissioner reasonably requires, and the commissioner approves the 5plan.SB98,3,86(b) The commissioner shall approve a plan of conversion submitted under par. 7(a) unless the commissioner finds, after a hearing, that any of the following would 8apply:SB98,3,991. The plan is contrary to law.SB98,3,12102. The surplus of the service insurance corporation or the contracts the 11service insurance corporation possesses with providers are inadequate to support 12the plan.SB98,3,14133. The plan is contrary to the interests of members of the cooperative 14association seeking conversion or the public.SB98,3,1715(4) Approval by members. After being approved by the commissioner under 16sub. (3) (b), the plan adopted under sub. (2) shall be submitted for approval to the 17members of the cooperative association in accordance with ch. 185.SB98,3,2218(5) Report approval to commissioner. A cooperative association seeking 19conversion under this section that has submitted a plan of conversion to the 20commissioner under sub. (3) (a) that is approved by the commissioner under sub. (3) 21(b) shall submit evidence to the commissioner that the members of the cooperative 22association approve of the plan of conversion under sub. (4).SB98,4,223(6) Amendment, abandonment, articles, and effect of conversion. (a) 1A plan of conversion approved by the members of a cooperative association under 2sub. (4) may be amended or abandoned as provided in s. 181.1163 (2) and (3).SB98,4,63(b) A cooperative association seeking conversion under this section that 4submits a plan of conversion for approval by its membership under sub. (4) that is 5approved by the membership shall file with the department of financial institutions 6articles of conversion as provided in s. 181.1164.SB98,4,77(c) The effect of conversion shall be as provided in s. 181.1165.SB98,4,108(7) Officers and directors. The officers and directors of a cooperative 9association converting into a service insurance corporation under this section shall 10be the initial officers and directors of the service insurance corporation.SB98,4,2011(8) Certificate of authority. If all requirements of the law are met, the 12commissioner shall issue a certificate of authority to the new service insurance 13corporation. Thereupon the cooperative association shall cease its legal existence 14and the corporate existence of the new service insurance corporation shall begin, 15but it shall be deemed to have been incorporated as of the date the converted 16cooperative association was incorporated. The new service insurance corporation 17shall have all the assets and be liable for all of the obligations of the converted 18cooperative association. The commissioner may grant a period not exceeding one 19year for adjustment to the requirements of ch. 613, specifying the extent to which 20particular provisions of ch. 613 do not apply.SB98,5,221(9) Expenses. A cooperative association converting into a service insurance 22corporation under this section may not pay compensation of any kind to existing 23personnel, in connection with the proposed conversion, other than regular salaries. 24With the commissioner’s approval, payment may be made at reasonable rates for 1printing costs and for legal and other professional fees for services actually 2rendered.SB98,5,33